Nebraska, session 109, LB138.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB138 LB138
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 68-9,111, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-9,111 (1)(a) Beginning with fiscal year 2024-25, contingent upon
implementation of the contractual agreements with medicaid managed care
organizations as described in subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall establish a fee-for-service pharmacy dispensing fee
reimbursement of ten dollars and thirty-eight cents per prescription for
any independent pharmacy until a cost-of-dispensing survey is completed.
The actual dispensing fee shall be determined by a cost-of-dispensing
survey administered by the department and completed by all medical
assistance program participating independent pharmacies every two years.
The change in the dispensing fee shall become effective following federal
approval of the medicaid state plan.
(b) For purposes of this section, independent pharmacy means any
pharmacy as defined in section 71-425 that owns six or fewer pharmacies.
(2) The department shall amend all medicaid managed care
organization contracts to authorize establishment of a managed care
pharmacy dispensing fee reimbursement in accordance with the established
fee-for-service pharmacy dispensing fee reimbursement per prescription
for independent pharmacies pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Any dispensing fee cost information submitted to the department
as part of the cost-of-dispensing survey described in subsection (1) of
this section that specifically identifies individual costs of a pharmacy
or provider shall remain confidential.
(4) No later than December 15, 2024, the department shall
electronically submit a report to the Clerk of the Legislature providing
recommendations for adjusting pharmacy dispensing fees between completion
of surveys to ensure fair and adequate reimbursement for independent
pharmacies and all other pharmacies participating in the medical
assistance program.
(5) Effective July 1, 2026, reimbursement of the dispensing fee for
-2-

LB138 LB138
2025 2025
independent pharmacies shall be ten dollars and thirty-eight cents per
prescription. For all other pharmacies, as defined in section 71-425, and
mail order pharmacies, reimbursement shall be paid per prescription as
follows: (a) For pharmacies with fewer than thirty thousand prescriptions
per year, ten dollars and thirty-eight cents; (b) for pharmacies with
thirty thousand or more prescriptions and fewer than seventy thousand
prescriptions per year, nine dollars and fifty-one cents; and (c) for
pharmacies with seventy thousand or more prescriptions per year, eight
dollars and thirty cents.
(6) No later than July 1, 2026, any pharmacy except a mail order
pharmacy, that is the only enrolled pharmacy within a thirty-mile radius
from another pharmacy shall be reimbursed a dispensing fee of ten dollars
and thirty-eight cents per prescription.
(7) No later than July 1, 2026, the department shall complete a
cost-of-dispensing survey as a follow-up to the survey released in
December, 2024, and electronically submit a report to the Clerk of the
Legislature that provides recommendations for adjusting pharmacy
dispensing fees annually to ensure fair and adequate reimbursement for
all pharmacies participating in the medical assistance program.
Sec. 2. Original section 68-9,111, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-